Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,185.07
Civil actions to which contributory negligence is a defense; sections applicable.

Sections 25-21,185.07 to 25-21,185.12 shall apply to all civil actions to which contributory negligence may be, pursuant to law, a defense that accrue on or after February 8, 1992, for damages arising out of injury to or death of a person or harm to property regardless of the theory of liability. Actions accruing prior to February 8, 1992, shall be governed by the laws in effect immediately prior to such date. Nothing in sections 25-21,185.07 to 25-21,185.12 shall be construed to limit wrongful death claims brought pursuant to sections 30-809 and 30-810, but such claims shall be subject to sections 25-21,185.07 to 25-21,185.12.

Laws 1992, LB 262, § 1.

In an action that accrued after February 8, 1992, the jury should not be instructed with the "slight" and "gross" comparative negligence formulation. City of Wahoo v. NIFCO Mech. Systems, 306 Neb. 203, 944 N.W.2d 757 (2020).

The Legislature did not intend for the comparative negligence scheme to apply in actions based on strict liability after February 8, 1992. Shipler v. General Motors Corp., 271 Neb. 194, 710 N.W.2d 807 (2006).